Utah statutes.
41-22-4.   Falsification of documents unlawful -- Alteration or removal of serial number unlawful -- Display of sticker.

A person may not:

(1)  knowingly falsify an application for registration, affidavit of ownership, or bill of sale for any off-highway vehicle;

(2)  alter, deface, or remove any manufacturer's serial number on any off-highway vehicle;

(3)  use or permit the use or display of any registration sticker, registration card, or permit upon an off-highway vehicle or in the operation of any off-highway vehicle other than the vehicle for which it was issued; or

(4)  alter or deface a registration sticker, registration card, or permit issued to an off-highway vehicle.

